Maine, session 132, LD1470.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §238 is enacted to read:
§238. Consumer assistance related to coverage and claims for reimbursement from
self-insured entity
1. Self-insured entity defined. For the purposes of this section, "self-insured entity"
means an employer or other entity that assumes the financial risk of potential loss in lieu
of purchasing an insurance policy for health, worker's compensation, property, automobile
or general liability coverage from an insurer authorized to transact insurance in this State
pursuant to this Title.
2. Liaison program. The bureau shall establish a liaison program, referred to in this
section as "the program," to provide assistance to consumers related to coverage and claims
for reimbursements from a self-insured entity as set forth in this section.
3. Duties. The duties of the program include:
A. Providing information to consumers on how to contact the program for assistance
through the bureau's publicly accessible website and through a toll-free number;
B. Providing information to consumers on the bureau's publicly accessible website
regarding state and federal laws, rules and regulations for self-insurance and the rights
and responsibilities of consumers related to coverage and claims for reimbursements
from a self-insured entity;
C. Assisting consumers with inquiries and complaints related to coverage and claims
for reimbursements from a self-insured entity, including referral to an appropriate
regulatory authority, if any; and
D. Acting as a liaison between consumers, regulatory authorities and self-insured
entities to facilitate the resolution of complaints.
4. Consumer complaint process. The bureau shall establish a process to receive
complaints from consumers regarding coverage or reimbursement of claims from a self-
insured entity.
5. Confidentiality. Complaints, records and correspondence relating to the program
are confidential to the same extent as complaints, records and correspondence relating to
consumer complaints are confidential under section 216.
6. Procedures for data collection. The bureau may establish procedures for
collecting, tracking and quantifying requests for assistance and complaints.
7. Aggregate information. The bureau shall compile and publish aggregate
information regarding complaints received under subsection 4 on its publicly accessible
website.
8. Staffing resources. The bureau may consider staffing resources and any limitations
on those resources when establishing guidelines regarding the assistance provided through
the program and complaint process.
9. Rules. The bureau may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
Page 1 - 132LR1311(01)

10. No legal representation. This section does not authorize the bureau to act as a
legal representative of a consumer in any manner through the program or complaint
process.